Connecticut, session 2026, SB00522.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
2 of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Energy and Environmental
3 Protection shall convey to the town of Killingworth a parcel of land
4 located on Roast Meat Hill Road at a cost equal to the fair market value
5 of the property, as determined by the average of the appraisals of two
6 independent appraisers selected by the commissioner, plus the
7 administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel of land has
8 an area of approximately ten acres, and is a portion of a parcel of land
9 depicted as Lot 50 on the Killingworth Tax Assessor Map 24 and
10 described in a warranty deed recorded September 28, 2001, in Book 170
11 at Page 272 of the Killingworth Land Records. The precise size and area
12 of the parcel to be conveyed shall be determined by the Commissioner
13 of Energy and Environmental Protection. If a survey of said parcel of
14 land for the purpose of the conveyance is deemed necessary by the
SB522 / File No. 659 1

SB522 File No. 659
15 commissioner, the town of Killingworth shall pay the costs of any such
16 survey. The conveyance shall be subject to the approval of the State
17 Properties Review Board.
18 (b) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
19 conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
20 receives a proposed agreement from the Commissioner of Energy and
21 Environmental Protection. The land shall remain under the care and
22 control of said commissioner until a conveyance is made in accordance
23 with the provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall execute and
24 deliver any deed or instrument necessary for a conveyance under this
25 section. The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection
26 shall have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of such
27 conveyance.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GOS Joint Favorable
SB522 / File No. 659 2

SB522 File No. 659
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Energy and GF - Loss of See Below See Below
Environmental Protection Asset
Resources of the General Fund GF - Revenue See Below See Below
Gain
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Killingworth Cost See Below See Below
Killingworth Gain of See Below See Below
Asset
Explanation
The bill conveys a specified parcel of land on Roast Meat Hill Road,
a part of Cockaponset State Forest totaling approximately 10 acres, from
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection to the town of
Killingworth. The state would lose use of the asset and gain revenues
equal to the fair market value of the property (most recently valued at
approximately $247,300). The town of Killingworth would gain use of
an asset and would pay fair market value of the property and the
administrative costs of the conveyance, including survey costs if
necessary.
The land conveyance is subject to the review and approval of the State
Properties Review Board.
The Out Years
SB522 / File No. 659 3

SB522 File No. 659
The conveyance action is one time in nature. Control of the asset
would continue into the future as described above, subject to future
municipal decisions.
SB522 / File No. 659 4

SB522 File No. 659
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 522
AN ACT CONVEYING A PARCEL OF STATE LAND TO THE TOWN
OF KILLINGWORTH.